Massachusetts, session 194th, H651.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION
Office of the Secretary
XXXX-XXXX For a competitive grant program to be administered by the executive
office of education, in consultation with the executive office of economic development and the
executive office of labor and workforce development, to provide capital and equipment funding
to expand high quality Chapter 74 career technical education and training programs in high-
demand, high-wage fields that are aligned to the commonwealth’s Regional Labor Market
Blueprints; provided that grant funds may be used for capital and equipment expenditures
including, but not limited to, construction of additions or new buildings, start-up lease costs,
of 8

improvement of existing infrastructure, demolition and removal of existing structures, and
purchase of equipment; provided further that grant funds may not be used to pay staff salaries,
professional development costs, or travel expenses, purchase school vehicles, or to offset
overhead costs; provided further, that vocational technical schools, agricultural high schools, and
comprehensive high schools offering no less than five Chapter 74 programs shall be eligible for
funds from this program; provided further, that eligible recipients shall be located in regions of
the commonwealth with wait lists for enrollment in Chapter 74 programs; provided further, that
funds may support the duplication by a comprehensive high school of existing Chapter 74
programs within a regional vocational-technical school district so long as there is demonstrated
student and labor market demand for said program and the regional vocational-technical school
district is unable to meet said demand; provided further, that preference in awarding grants shall
be given to: (i) schools serving Gateway Cities, (ii) schools with existing Chapter 74 programs in
high-demand, high-wage fields that have an excess of applications over seats, (iii) schools with
demonstrated strong connections to regional employers, and (iv) schools which have received
Chapter 74 program approval by the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education and
have a demonstrated ability to promptly expand capacity to implement said program; provided
further, that no individual grant award shall exceed $25,000,000; provided further that initial
term of said grant program shall be three years; provided further that not less than $100,000,000
shall be awarded per year during the initial term; provided further, that the executive office of
education, in consultation with the executive office of economic development and the executive
office of labor and workforce development, shall adopt additional guidelines as necessary for the
administration of the program; and provided further that funds for this Section shall come from
of 8

revenue generated by the Fair Share Amendment passed by voters in November of 2022 and
which amended Article XLIV of the Massachusetts Constitution.
………………..$300,000,000
SECTION 2. Section 10 of Chapter 70B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new subsection:
(d) Notwithstanding any state law, state regulation, or agency policy to the contrary, the
authority shall be authorized and directed to add twenty (20) percentage points to the project
reimbursement rates for regional vocational-technical high school and county, regional and
independent agricultural high school construction so that reimbursement rates for such projects
are not less than 75% nor more than 90% of the eligible costs. Further, the authority shall add
five (5) percentage points to the reimbursement rate for any project that includes state-approved
vocational-technical education programs as defined in Chapter 74 of the General Laws aligned
with priorities specifically identified in the Regional Labor Market Blueprint for the region in
which the school is located. However, additional percentage points shall not be awarded unless
the school currently offers five (5) or more Chapter 74 programs. In no case shall the total
reimbursement for a project exceed 90% of eligible costs.
SECTION 3. Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following sections:-
Section 38. For the purposes of sections 38 and 39, inclusive, the following terms shall
have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
of 8

“District of residence”, shall mean the school district of the city or town where a student
resides.
“School of residence”, shall mean the middle school or junior high school a student
attends within their district of residence.
Section 39. (a) The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and
implement policies and promulgate regulations to promote, enhance, and expand vocational-
technical education programs, as defined in Chapter 74 of the General Laws, in the
commonwealth.
(b) The department shall:
(i) oversee all Chapter 74 approved programs and ensure compliance with M.G.L.
Chapter 74 and related regulations;
(ii) work to increase awareness of vocational-technical education and career opportunities
among students in elementary schools, junior high schools, and middle schools;
(iii) ensure that schools offering Chapter 74 programs are provided reasonable access
during the school day at schools of residence to meet with all students and distribute information
about vocational-technical education and careers to said students, including English language
learners, students with disabilities, students of color, and other student populations, to ensure that
such information is provided equitably to all learners;
(iv) ensure that schools offering Chapter 74 programs are given the opportunity during
the school day to host middle school tours, with transportation costs paid by the school hosting
the tour, for all middle school students in member communities, including English language
of 8

learners, students with disabilities, students of color, and other student populations to ensure that
such opportunities are provided equitably to all learners; and further ensure that the school of
residence may not count middle school student tours of vocational schools or programs during
the school day as unexcused absences if the vocational school or program confirms the student's
participation, and may not unreasonably withhold student access to tours of vocational schools
and programs during the school day.
(v) require that schools offering Chapter 74 programs are given the opportunity to
provide middle and junior high school students with information about vocational-technical
programs and careers through mail and email.
(vi) require all middle schools and junior high schools in member communities to
establish and implement a Chapter 74 Access Policy, in accordance with state requirements
promoting equitable access to Chapter 74 programs, outlining specific ways in which the middle
schools will collaborate with regional vocational-technical high schools and agricultural high
schools to: provide staff members from Chapter 74 schools with direct school day access to all
middle school students, to inform them about opportunities in vocational-technical and
agricultural education and to distribute materials about such opportunities to them; provide all
middle school students an opportunity to tour, during regular middle school hours, the regional
vocational-technical high school and/or county agricultural school of which the middle school’s
city or town is a member, with the transportation costs of all such tours being borne by the
school hosting the tours; provide contact information for all seventh grade and eighth-grade
middle school students, including a student’s name and mailing address, a student’s personal
email address, and the parent’s/guardian’s email address by October 15 of each school year;
of 8

(vii) establish, in addition to the minimum requirements outlined in the preceding
subsections, such additional requirements for Chapter 74 Access Policies as the office deems
reasonable and necessary to promote equitable access by all students to information about
vocational-technical and agricultural education;
100 (viii) require all sending school districts which are members of a regional-vocational
101 school district or whose community is located in the county or district of an agricultural high
102 school to submit the Chapter 74 Access Policy annually to the department; annually attest in
103 writing that the Chapter 74 Access Policy is being implemented equitably and that all students
104 are being provided with information, access, and tours in accordance with this section and with
105 federal and state civil rights laws, regulations, and policies; and post the Chapter 74 Access
106 Policy on its district website and provide written copies to students and parents, upon request;
107 (ix) create a mechanism to enforce timely implementation of Chapter 74 Access Policies;
108 (x) establish a system to ensure that students who live in communities that are not
109 members of or affiliated with a regional vocational-technical high school district or agricultural
110 high school annually are provided with information about their high school options, including
111 their option to seek an education in a vocational-technical or agricultural high school;
112 (xi) provide technical support to schools seeking to offer Chapter 74 programs that meet
113 regional labor market demands and do not duplicate existing programs in the region;
114 (xii) support the continuation of state grant programs that provide funding for equipment
115 purchases and facility expansion; and
of 8

116 (xiii) support the continuation of demonstration programs that provide opportunities in
117 vocational-technical education for students unable to secure a seat in an approved Chapter 74
118 program due to lack of enrollment capacity.
119 SECTION 4. Chapter 70B of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
120 Section 1A(b), as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the
121 following:-
122 (b) The authority shall consist of the state treasurer, who shall serve as chairperson, the
123 secretary of administration and finance, the commissioner of education, and 4 additional
124 members appointed by the state treasurer, 2 of whom shall have practical experience in
125 educational facilities planning, school building construction, or architecture and school design, 1
126 of whom shall be a person in the field of education with demonstrated knowledge of
127 Massachusetts curriculum frameworks and other relevant federal and state educational standards,
128 and 1 of whom shall be a person in the field of vocational education with demonstrated
129 knowledge of Massachusetts Chapter 74 vocational education curriculum frameworks and other
130 relevant federal and state vocational educational standards, each of whom shall serve a term of 2
131 years; but, a person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term. An
132 appointed member of the authority shall be eligible for reappointment. The authority shall
133 annually elect 1 of its members to serve as vice-chairperson. Each member of the authority
134 serving ex officio may appoint a designee pursuant to section 6A of chapter 30.
135 SECTION 5. Section 3A of Chapter 70B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
136 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the number “17” and inserting “19” in place
137 thereof, and further by inserting, after “Fire Chiefs' Association of Massachusetts, Inc.” the
of 8

138 following:- “,Massachusetts Association of Vocational Administrators, Inc., Alliance for
139 Vocational Technical Education,”.
140 SECTION 6. Subsection (c) of section 14B of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as
141 appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the third sentence and
142 inserting in place thereof the following 2 sentences:-
143 “Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a city or town may
144 simultaneously be a member of a vocational regional school district and any other type of
145 regional school district. A city or town that belongs to a regional vocational school district may
146 offer a vocational technical education program in its municipal high school; provided, however,
147 that the program is approved under section 2 of chapter 74 of the General Laws; provided,
148 further, that a vocational regional school district and any other type of regional school district
149 serving the same town shall collaborate through the office of career technical education in
150 offering reciprocal non-competitive programs under chapter 74 of the General Laws; provided,
151 further, that there is demonstrated student and labor market demand for said program as
152 determined by the Regional Labor Market Blueprint and the regional vocational-technical school
153 district is unable or unwilling to meet said demand.”
of 8